District of Columbia statutes.
31-406

Reporting requirements.

(a)

In addition to any other required loss reserve certification, the controlled insurer shall annually, on April 1 of each year, file with the Mayor an opinion of an independent casualty actuary, or any other independent loss reserve specialist acceptable to the Mayor reporting loss reserve for each line of business written and attesting to the adequacy of loss reserves established for losses incurred and outstanding as of year-end, including that incurred, but not reported, on business placed by the producer.

(b)

The controlled insurer shall annually report to the Mayor the amount of commissions paid to the producer, the percentage the amount represents of the net premiums written, and comparable amounts and percentage paid to noncontrolling producers for placements of the same kinds of insurance.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-52, § 7, 40 DCR 6129
Apr. 26, 1994, D.C. Law 10-103, § 9, 41 DCR 1005

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-403.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4006.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 9 of the Insurance Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-76, March 17 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1626).